District of Columbia statutes.
44-1636

Reviewing compliance.

Compliance with this chapter is determined in light of the facts and circumstances existing at the time a decision is made or action is taken.

History

Jan. 23, 2008, D.C. Law 17-69, § 7, 54 DCR 11650

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 7 of the Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act of 2007.